Hawaii statutes.
§803-2 By oral order. Where a breach
of the peace or other offense has been committed, and the offender endeavors to
escape, the offender may be arrested by virtue of an oral order of any
magistrate, or without the order, if no magistrate is present. [PC 1869, c 49,
§2; RL 1925, §3968; RL 1935, §5401; RL 1945, §10702; RL 1955, §255-2; HRS
§708-2; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next